Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1218.01
Decisions of Interstate Commission for Emergency Medical Services Personnel Practice; board; duties.

The board shall review decisions of the Interstate Commission for Emergency Medical Services Personnel Practice established pursuant to the EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact. Upon approval by the commission of any action that will have the result of increasing the cost to the state for membership in the compact, the board may recommend to the Legislature that Nebraska withdraw from the compact.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 22.

EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact, see section 38-3801.